Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-903
Fish restoration and management projects; cooperation with federal government; state's consent.

The State of Nebraska hereby assents to the provisions of an Act of Congress entitled An Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in fish restoration and management projects, and for other purposes, approved August 9, 1950, (Public Law No. 681, 81st Congress), and the Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to perform such acts as may be necessary to the conduct and establishment of cooperative fish restoration and management projects, as defined in the Act of Congress, in compliance with such act and with rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Interior thereunder. No funds accruing to the State of Nebraska from permit fees paid for fishing shall be diverted for any other purpose than the administration of the Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 1951, c. 108, § 1, p. 516;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-423.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 364.